apertium-en-it.it.dix
    <pardef n="corr/ompere__vblex">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>uppi</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompevate</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompeste</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompevi</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompesti</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>upper</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>uppero</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>omperemmo</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>uppe</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompano</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ompesser</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>omperei</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompiamo</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompa</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompereste</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>omperesti</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>omperebber</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompono</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>omperebbero</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>otte</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>omperebbe</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompe</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>omperemo</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>otti</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>otta</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>otto</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompessimo</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>omperò</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompessi</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>omperete</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompeste</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>omperai</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompessi</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>omperan</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>omperanno</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>omperà</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompevamo</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompemmo</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompevo</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompessero</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompete</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompesse</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompi</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompiamo</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompa</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompiate</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ompevan</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompa</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompevano</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompendo</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompeva</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ompan</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompiamo</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompo</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompete</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompi</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>omper</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ompon</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ompere</l>
	  <r>ompere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
	</p>
      </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="corrompere"><i>corr</i><par n="corr/ompere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="interrompere"><i>interr</i><par n="corr/ompere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rompere"><i>r</i><par n="corr/ompere__vblex"/></e>
